Florida, session 2026, SB738.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 48.193, Florida 13 Statutes, is amended to read: 14 48.193âActs subjecting person to jurisdiction of courts of 15 state.â 16 (2)âA defendant who is engaged in substantial and not 17 isolated activity within this state, whether such activity is 18 wholly interstate, intrastate, or otherwise, is subject to the 19 jurisdiction of the courts of this state, regardless of whether 20 or not the claim arises from that activity. Such activity 21 includes, but is not limited to, a request by a defendant, 22 regardless of his or her location, to a resident of this state 23 to transfer virtual currency as defined in s. 560.103 to an 24 account located outside of this state. 25 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.